District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.67

District of Columbia.

All permits, licenses, franchises, benefits, exemptions, or advantages issued by or on behalf of the government of the District of Columbia, shall specifically require and be conditioned upon full compliance with the provisions of this chapter; and shall further specify that the failure or refusal to comply with any provision of this chapter shall be a proper basis for revocation of such permit, license, franchise, benefit, exemption, or advantage.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 267, 24 DCR 6038
This section is referenced in § 2-1401.02 and § 34-1731.09.
1981 Ed., § 1-2531.
1973 Ed., § 6-2277.